Missouri, session 2026, SB970.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.448, to read as
follows:
376.448. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing", any co-payment, coinsurance,
deductible, amount paid by an enrollee for health care
services in excess of a coverage limitation, or similar
charge required by or on behalf of an enrollee in order to
receive a specific health care service covered by a health
benefit plan, whether covered under medical benefits or
pharmacy benefits. The term "cost-sharing" shall include
cost-sharing as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 18022(c);
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(3) "Generic drug", the same meaning given to the term
in 42 CFR 423.4;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;

SCS SB 970 2
(5) "Health care service", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(6) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(7) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388.
2. When calculating an enrollee's overall contribution
to any out-of-pocket maximum or any cost-sharing requirement
under a health benefit plan, a health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall include any amounts paid by the
enrollee or paid on behalf of the enrollee for any
medication where a generic drug substitute for such
medication is not available.
3. A health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager shall
not vary an enrollee's out-of-pocket maximum or any cost-
sharing requirement based on, or otherwise design benefits
in a manner that takes into account, the availability of any
cost-sharing assistance program for any medication where a
generic drug substitute for such medication is not available.
4. If, under federal law, application of the
requirement under subsection 2 of this section would result
in health savings account ineligibility under Section 223 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the
requirement under subsection 2 of this section shall apply
to health savings account-qualified high deductible health
plans with respect to any cost-sharing of such a plan after
the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under
Section 223, except with respect to items or services that
are preventive care under Section 223(c)(2)(C) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in which case the
requirement of subsection 2 of this section shall apply

SCS SB 970 3
regardless of whether the minimum deductible under Section
223 has been satisfied.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health
carrier or health benefit plan from utilizing step therapy
in accordance with section 376.2034.
6. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
health benefit plans that are covered under the Labor
Management Relations Act of 1947, 29 U.S.C. Section 141, et
seq., as amended.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply to
health benefit plans entered into, amended, extended, or
renewed on or after August 28, 2026.
8. No changes to the provisions of the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 as codified in 29
U.S.C. Chapter 18 and in effect on January 1, 2026, shall
alter or in any way weaken the exemption in subsection 6 of
this section.
9. As specified in subsection 3 of this section, the
provisions of this section shall only apply to the instances
where a generic drug substitute for the medication is not
available.
✓